Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.530

Broadband office—Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and RCW 43.330.532 through 43.330.538, 43.330.412, 43.330.5393, and 43.330.5395 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)(a) "Advanced telecommunications capability" means, without regard to any transmission media or technology, high-speed, switched, broadband telecommunications capability that enables users to originate and receive high quality voice, data, graphics, and video telecommunications using any technology.

(b) "Advanced telecommunications capability" does not include access to a technology that delivers transmission speeds below the minimum download and upload speeds provided in the definition of broadband in this section.

(2) "Aging individual" means an individual 55 years of age or older.

(3) "Board" means the public works board established in RCW 43.155.030.

(4) "Broadband" or "broadband service" means any service providing advanced telecommunications capability and internet access with transmission speeds that, at a minimum, provide 100 megabits per second download and 20 megabits per second upload.

(5) "Broadband adoption" means the process by which an individual obtains daily access to the internet:

(a) At a speed, quality, price, and capacity necessary for the individual to accomplish common tasks, such that the access qualifies as an advanced telecommunications capability;

(b) Providing individuals with the digital skills necessary to participate online;

(c) On a device connected to the internet and other advanced telecommunications services via a secure and convenient network, with associated end-user broadband infrastructure equipment such as wifi mesh router or repeaters to enable the device to adequately use the internet network; and

(d) With technical support and digital navigation assistance to enable continuity of service and equipment use and utilization.

(6) "Broadband infrastructure" means networks of deployed telecommunications equipment and technologies necessary to provide high-speed internet access and other advanced telecommunications services to end users.

(7) "Department" means the department of commerce.

(8) "Digital equity" means the condition in which individuals and communities in Washington have the information technology capacity that is needed for full participation in society and the economy.

(9)(a) "Digital inclusion" means the activities that are necessary to ensure that all individuals in Washington have access to, and the use of, affordable information and communication technologies including, but not limited to:

(i) Reliable broadband internet service;

(ii) Internet-enabled devices that meet the needs of the user; and

(iii) Applications and online content designed to enable and encourage self-sufficiency, participation, and collaboration.

(b) "Digital inclusion" also includes obtaining access to digital literacy training, the provision of quality technical support, and obtaining basic awareness of measures to ensure online privacy and cybersecurity.

(10) "Digital literacy" means the skills associated with using technology to enable users to use information and communications technologies to find, evaluate, organize, create, and communicate information.

(11) "Last mile infrastructure" means broadband infrastructure that serves as the final connection from a broadband service provider's network to the end-use customer's on-premises telecommunications equipment.

(12) "Local government" includes cities, towns, counties, municipal corporations, public port districts, public utility districts, quasi-municipal corporations, special purpose districts, and multiparty entities comprised of public entity members.

(13) "Low-income" means households as defined by the department of social and health services, provided that the definition may not exceed the higher of 80 percent of area median household income or the self-sufficiency standard as determined by the University of Washington's self-sufficiency calculator.

(14) "Middle mile infrastructure" means broadband infrastructure that links a broadband service provider's core network infrastructure to last mile infrastructure.

(15) "Office" means the governor's statewide broadband office established in RCW 43.330.532.

(16) "Tribe" means any federally recognized Indian tribe whose traditional lands and territories included parts of Washington.

(17) "Underserved population" means any of the following:

(a) Individuals who live in low-income households;

(b) Aging individuals;

(c) Incarcerated individuals;

(d) Veterans;

(e) Individuals with disabilities;

(f) Individuals with a language barrier, including individuals who are English learners or who have low levels of literacy;

(g) Individuals who are members of a racial or ethnic minority group;

(h) Individuals who primarily reside in a rural area;

(i) Children and youth in foster care; or

(j) Individuals experiencing housing instability.

(18) "Unserved areas" means areas of Washington in which households and businesses lack access to broadband service, as defined by the office.

[ 2022 c 265 s 301; 2022 c 237 s 2; 2019 c 365 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: (1) The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

(2) This section was amended by 2022 c 237 s 2 and by 2022 c 265 s 301, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2022 c 265 ss 101, 102, 301-305, and 401: "Sections 101, 102, 301 through 305, and 401 of this act take effect July 1, 2023." [ 2022 c 265 s 502.]

Short title—Findings—Intent—2022 c 265: See notes following RCW 43.330.539.

Intent—2022 c 237: "The legislature recognizes the statewide broadband office's objective of scalability while appreciating that a digital economy will continue to drive higher and higher speeds. Therefore, the legislature intends to move towards adequate connectivity in terms of the needs of economic development, education, and telehealth services." [ 2022 c 237 s 1.]

Findings—2019 c 365: See note following RCW 43.330.532.